Tennessee, session 114, HB1955.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The commissioner of commerce and insurance shall utilize existing
resources to publish a report, on or before October 1, 2026, that contains data on violations of §
56-7-3124 reported to the commissioner as alleged to have occurred during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026. The report must include the total number of violations reported, the
commissioner's findings as a result of any investigations into the alleged violations, and the
penalties imposed by the commissioner upon pharmacy benefits managers found to have
violated § 56-7-3124. The commissioner shall submit a copy of the report to the chief clerk of
the senate, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, and the legislative librarian. The
report may be published and delivered by electronic means.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1955
010415
- 1 -